Massachusetts, session 194th, S123.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be a
special commission to study and provide recommendations on improving the oversight,
administration, and integrity of the Electronic Benefit Transfer (EBT) system in the
Commonwealth. The commission shall examine the current processes for issuing EBT cards,
eligibility verification, fraud prevention, and compliance with federal and state laws. The study
shall focus on: (1) Evaluating methods to improve eligibility verification, including cross-
referencing Social Security data, death records, and incarceration status; (2) Assessing the
feasibility of implementing photo identification on EBT cards; (3) Reviewing the administrative
practices for distributing and managing EBT cards to prevent misuse and fraud; (4)
Recommending best practices for data sharing between state and federal agencies; (5) Exploring
the potential creation of an EBT audit system for enhanced accountability. The commission shall
make recommendations for policy reforms to strengthen program integrity, reduce fraud, and
ensure that EBT benefits are used as intended.
of 2

SECTION 2. The commission shall consist of the Secretary of Health and Human
Services or their designee, who shall serve as chair; the Commissioner of the Department of
Transitional Assistance (DTA) or their designee; the State Auditor or their designee; the
Attorney General or their designee; the Treasurer and Receiver General or their designee; the
House Chair of the Joint Committee on Children, Families, and Persons with Disabilities or their
designee; the Senate Chair of the Joint Committee on Children, Families, and Persons with
Disabilities or their designee; one member appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives; one member appointed by the President of the Senate; one representative from
the Massachusetts Chiefs of Police Association; the House Minority Leader or a designee; the
Senate Minority Leader or a designee; one representative from the Massachusetts Municipal
Association; and two public members with expertise in public welfare programs, fraud
prevention, or data security, appointed by the Governor.
The commission shall hold not fewer than four public hearings across different regions of
the Commonwealth to gather input from stakeholders, beneficiaries, and the public.
SECTION 3. The commission shall submit its findings, along with any legislative or
regulatory recommendations, to the Governor, the Clerk of the House of Representatives, the
Clerk of the Senate, the Joint Committee on Children, Families, and Persons with Disabilities,
and the House and Senate Committees on Ways and Means no later than 12 months after the
passage of this act.
of 2